Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2106
Written receipt; required; when.

The lessor shall furnish the consumer upon request with an itemized written receipt for payment in cash or any other method of payment which itself does not provide evidence of payment.

Laws 1989, LB 681, § 6.